California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(3) Type 5B, or “mixed-light,” means for cultivation using a combination of natural and supplemental artificial lighting at a maximum threshold to be determined by the department greater than 22,000 square feet, inclusive, of total canopy size on one premises.

(c) No Type 5, Type 5A, or Type 5B cultivation licenses may be issued before January 1, 2023.

(d) Commencing on January 1, 2023, a Type 5, Type 5A, or Type 5B licensee may apply for and hold a Type 6 or Type 7 license and apply for and hold a Type 10 license. A Type 5, Type 5A, or Type 5B licensee shall not be eligible to apply for or hold any of the following license types:

(1) Type 8.

(2) Type 11.

(3) Type 12, authorized to engage in Type 11 distribution.

(4) Type 15, authorized to engage in Type 11 distribution.

(e) A licensee that holds a cultivation license eligible for conversion to a Type 5, Type 5A, or Type 5B shall not be eligible to apply for or hold a Type 15 license for those cultivation activities eligible for conversion, or that includes a Type 11 distribution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 875, Sec. 6.   (SB 1064)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26061.5.

(a) Beginning no later than March 1, 2024, the department shall allow a cultivation licensee to do both of the following:

(1) Change the type of size of a cultivation license as set forth in subdivision (b).

(2) Place a cultivation license in inactive status as set forth in subdivision (c).

(b) The department shall allow a licensee to change the type of size of a cultivation license, as follows:

(1) At the time of license renewal, a licensee may change an existing cultivation license to a cultivation license type with a smaller maximum canopy
 size.

(2) At the time of each subsequent license renewal, a licensee may do any of the following:

(A) Restore the licensee’s original cultivation license type.

(B) Maintain the cultivation license type selected by the licensee pursuant to paragraph (1).

(C) Change to a different cultivation license type with a maximum canopy size smaller than the licensee’s original cultivation license type, which may be larger or smaller than the cultivation license type selected by the licensee pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) If a licensee holds a provisional license, the licensee may do either of the following, at the election of the licensee:

(A) Continue to pursue the requirements for annual licensure in connection with the licensee’s original cultivation license type.

(B) Pursue the requirements for annual licensure in connection with a smaller cultivation license type selected pursuant to this subdivision.

(4) Nothing in this subdivision requires the department to allow changes to nursery licenses or to the classification of a cultivation license as indoor, outdoor, or mixed-light.

(c) The department shall allow a licensee to place a cultivation license in inactive status at the time of license renewal, as follows:

(1) A licensee who holds a license in inactive status shall not engage in the cultivation of cannabis, except that the department may allow a licensee with a
 license in inactive status to do both of the following:

(A) Engage in the drying, curing, grading, trimming, packaging, and sale of cannabis harvested before the date the license was placed in inactive status.

(B) Possess and maintain seeds and immature plants used solely for propagation to preserve the genetic lineage of the licensee’s cannabis plants.

(2) A license in inactive status shall remain in inactive status until the license is next renewed. At that next renewal, and at each renewal thereafter, the license may be placed in either active or inactive status, at the election of the licensee.

(3) A licensee who holds a license in inactive status shall pay a reduced license fee in an amount determined by the department in accordance with Section
 26180.

(4) A license in inactive status shall remain a license issued pursuant to this division. All of the following apply to a licensee who holds a license in inactive status:

(A) The licensee shall continue to comply with all laws and regulations applicable to cultivation licensees.

(B) If the licensee holds a provisional license, the licensee shall continue to pursue requirements for annual licensure.

(C) The licensee shall be allowed to maintain eligibility for state programs available to cultivation licensees, including, but not limited to, grant programs.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 26050, the department shall allow each licensee a one-time opportunity to change
 the date of license renewal, in implementing subdivisions (b) and (c).

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may adopt emergency regulations to implement this section. The provisions of Section 26013 shall be applicable to emergency regulations adopted or readopted pursuant to this section. The adoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 886, Sec. 1.   (SB 833)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

26062.

(a) (1) (A) No later than July 1, 2021, the Department of Food and Agriculture shall establish a program for cannabis that is comparable to the National Organic Program (Section 6517 of the federal Organic Foods Production Act of 1990 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq.)), and the California Organic Food and Farming Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 46000) of Division 17 of the Food and Agricultural Code) and Article 7 (commencing with Section 110810) of Chapter 5 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code. For purposes of administrating this paragraph, the Department of Food and Agriculture shall be exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(B) The Department of Food and Agriculture may collect fees to cover the reasonable regulatory costs of performing duties pursuant to this paragraph. The Department of Food and Agriculture may deny, suspend, or revoke a registration or certification issued under the program established pursuant to this paragraph for a violation of the program or Section 26062.5. A violation of the program established pursuant to this paragraph or Section 26062.5 may also be subject to a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for each individual violation.

(C) A person may request a hearing to contest a denial, suspension, revocation, or civil penalty levied pursuant to this paragraph by submitting a written request within 30 days of service. The hearing shall be held pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3
 of Title 2 of the Government Code and any informal hearing regulations adopted by the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(D) After the exhaustion of the administrative and judicial review procedures, the Department of Food and Agriculture may apply to the appropriate superior court for a judgment in the amount of the administrative penalty and an order compelling the person to comply with the order of the Department of Food and Agriculture. The application, which shall include a certified copy of the final order of the Department of Food and
 Agriculture, shall constitute a sufficient showing to warrant the issuance of the judgment and order.

(E) Any penalties or fees collected by the Department of Food and Agriculture pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(2) (A) No later than July 1, 2021, the State Department of Public Health shall establish a certification program for manufactured cannabis products that is comparable to the National Organic Program (Section 6517 of the federal Organic Foods Production Act of 1990 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq.)), the California Organic Food and Farming Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 46000) of Division 17 of the Food and Agricultural Code), and Article 7 (commencing with Section 110810) of Chapter 5 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code. For purposes of
 administrating this paragraph, the State Department of Public Health shall be exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(B) For the purposes of enforcement of this paragraph, any authorized agent of the State Department of Public Health, including those defined in Section 109945 of the Health and Safety Code, may examine records and inspect the premises of a cannabis manufacturer and embargo cannabis products in that premises as necessary to perform the duties pursuant to this paragraph.

(C) The State Department of Public Health may collect fees to cover the reasonable regulatory costs of performing duties pursuant to this paragraph. The State Department of Public Health may deny, suspend, or revoke a registration or certification issued pursuant to this paragraph for a
 violation of the certification program or for a violation of Section 26062.5, consistent with Section 110875 of the Health and Safety Code. The State Department of Public Health may levy a civil penalty for a violation of the certification program or Section 26062.5. The amount of any penalty imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall be consistent with Section 110915 of the Health and Safety Code. A person subject to a penalty shall have the right to an informal hearing, consistent with Section 110915 of the Health and Safety Code. Any penalties or fees collected by the State Department of Public Health pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited in the Food Safety Fund established pursuant to Section 110050 of the Health and Safety Code for use by the State Department of Public Health, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purpose of administering the certification program.

(b) If at any time preceding or following the establishment
 of a program pursuant to subdivision (a), the National Organic Program (Section 6517 of the federal Organic Foods Production Act of 1990 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq.)) authorizes organic designation and certification for cannabis, this section shall become inoperative and, as of January 1, of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 49) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 87, Sec. 4.   (SB 160)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed, by its own provisions, on January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

26062.5.

A person shall not represent, sell, or offer for sale any cannabis or cannabis product as organic except in accordance with the National Organic Program (Section 6517 of the federal Organic Foods Production Act of 1990 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq.)), if applicable. A person shall not represent, sell, or offer for sale any cannabis or cannabis product with the designation or certification established by the Department of Food and Agriculture or the State Department of Public Health pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 26062 except in accordance with that subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 40, Sec. 8.   (AB 97)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

26063.

(a) (1) No later than January 1, 2018, the department shall establish standards by which a licensed cultivator may designate a county, city, or city and county of origin for cannabis. To be eligible for the designation, 100 percent of the cannabis shall be produced within the designated county, city, or city and county, as defined by finite political boundaries.

(2) Cannabis shall not be advertised, marketed, labeled, or sold as produced in a California county, city, or city and county, including any similar name that is likely to mislead consumers as to the kind of cannabis, when the cannabis was not produced in that county, city, or city and county.

(3) The name of a California county, city, or city and county, including any similar name that is likely to mislead consumers as to the kind of cannabis contained in the product, shall not be used in the advertising, labeling, marketing, or packaging of cannabis products unless 100 percent of the cannabis contained in the product was produced in that county, city, or city and county.

(b) (1) No later than January 1,
 2022,
 the Department of Food and Agriculture shall establish a process by which licensed cultivators may establish appellations of origin, including standards, practices, and cultivars applicable to cannabis produced in a certain geographical area in California, not otherwise specified in subdivision (a).

(2) Cannabis shall not be advertised, marketed, labeled, or sold using an appellation of origin established pursuant to paragraph (1), including any similar name that is likely to mislead consumers as to the kind of cannabis, unless the cannabis meets the appellation of origin requirements for, and was produced in, the geographical area.

(3) An appellation of origin established pursuant to this subdivision, including any similar name that is likely to mislead consumers as to the kind of cannabis contained in a product, shall not be used in the advertising, labeling,
 marketing, or packaging of a cannabis product unless 100 percent of the cannabis contained in the product meets the appellation of origin requirements and was produced in the geographical area.

(4) The Department of Food and Agriculture may collect fees to cover the reasonable regulatory costs of performing duties pursuant to this section. Any fees collected by the Department of Food and Agriculture pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(c) An appellation of origin shall not be approved unless it requires the practice of planting in the ground in the canopy area and excludes the practices of using structures, including a greenhouse, hoop house, glasshouse, conservatory, hothouse, and any similar structure, and any
 artificial light in the canopy area.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 50) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 87, Sec. 5.   (SB 160)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26065.

An employee engaged in the cultivation of cannabis under this division shall be subject to Wage Order No. 4-2001 of the Industrial Welfare Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 55.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26066.

Indoor and outdoor cannabis cultivation by persons and entities licensed under this division shall be conducted in accordance with state and local laws related to land conversion, current building and fire standards, grading, electricity usage, water usage, water quality, woodland and riparian habitat protection, agricultural discharges, and similar matters. State agencies, including, but not limited to, the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the State Water Resources Control Board, the California regional water quality control boards, and traditional state law enforcement agencies, shall address environmental impacts of cannabis cultivation and shall coordinate when appropriate with cities and counties and their law enforcement agencies in enforcement efforts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 56.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26066.1.

The department may enter into a cooperative agreement with a county agricultural commissioner or other state or local agency to assist the department in implementing the provisions of this division related to administration, investigation, inspection, fee collection, document management, education and outreach, distribution of individual licenses approved by the department, and technical assistance pertaining to the cultivation of cannabis. The department shall pay compensation under a cooperative agreement from fees collected and deposited pursuant to this division and shall provide reimbursement to a county agricultural commissioner, state, or local agency for associated costs. The department shall not delegate through a cooperative agreement, or otherwise, its authority to issue cultivation licenses to a county agricultural commissioner, local agency, or another state agency. The department shall provide notice of any cooperative agreement entered into pursuant to this section to other relevant state agencies involved in the regulation of cannabis cultivation. No cooperative agreement under this section shall relieve the department of its obligations under subdivision (a) of Section 26012 to administer the provisions of this division related to, and associated with, the cultivation of cannabis.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 26069.1 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 54.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26066.2.

(a) A county agricultural commissioner may report to the director on the condition, acreage, production, and value of cannabis produced in the commissioner’s county under a cultivation license issued pursuant to this division. The cannabis data may be submitted in a separate report that is similar to those reports required for agricultural products pursuant to Section 2279 of the Food and Agricultural Code. This section does not require the department to publish this report.

(b) Data on cannabis production that is included in a report pursuant to this section may be organized by categories including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) State cultivator license type, as set forth in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 26050), and regulations adopted pursuant to that
 chapter.

(2) Local license, permit, or other authorization type, as described in Section 26200.

(3) Price tier, including for different strains of cannabis, different production methods, or different parts of a plant, such as flowers or leaves.

(c) A county agricultural commissioner shall not seek reimbursement for expenses incurred in making a report pursuant to this section from either of the following sources:

(1) The Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(2) Funding that may otherwise be available for the purposes of this section from a cooperative agreement entered into pursuant to Section 2222 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 26069.5 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 55.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.5. Unique Identifiers and Track and Trace [26067. - 26069.]

26067.

(a) The department shall establish a track and trace program for reporting the movement of cannabis, industrial hemp, and cannabis products throughout the distribution chain that utilizes a unique identifier and is capable of providing information that captures, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) The licensee or industrial hemp cultivator from which the cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis product originates and the licensee receiving the cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis product.

(2) The transaction date.

(3) The unique identifier or identifiers for
 the cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis product.

(4) The date of retail sale to a customer and whether the sale is conducted on the retail premises or by delivery.

(5) Information relating to cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products leaving the licensed premises in a delivery vehicle as determined by regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 26068.

(6) The destruction of any cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis product. 

(b) (1) The department, in consultation with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, shall create an electronic system containing the electronic shipping manifests
 to facilitate the administration of the track and trace program, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(A) The variety and quantity or weight of cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products shipped.

(B) The estimated times of departure and arrival.

(C) The variety and quantity or weight of cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products received.

(D) The actual time of departure and arrival.

(E) A categorization and the unique identifier of the cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis product.

(F) The license
 number issued by the department for all licensees involved in the shipping process, including, but not limited to, cannabis cultivators, manufacturers, distributors, and retailers.

(2) The electronic system shall be designed to flag irregularities for the department to investigate.

(3) The department and state and local agencies may, at any time, inspect shipments and request documentation for current inventory.

(4) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall have read access to the electronic system for the purpose of taxation and regulation of cannabis and cannabis products.

(5) Information received and contained in records kept by the department
 for the purposes of administering this chapter are confidential and shall not be disclosed pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), except as necessary for authorized employees of the State of California or any city, county, or city and county to perform official duties pursuant to this division or a local ordinance.

(6) Upon the request of a state or local law enforcement agency, the department shall allow access to or provide information contained within the electronic system to assist law enforcement in their duties and responsibilities pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 35.5.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26068.

(a) The department, in consultation with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, shall ensure that the track and trace program can also track and trace the amount of the cultivation tax due pursuant to Part 14.5 (commencing with Section 34010) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The track and trace program shall include an electronic software tracking system to capture data and track movement of cannabis through the commercial supply chain from cultivation to sale.

(b) The department shall ensure that licensees under this division are allowed to use third-party applications, programs, and information technology systems to comply with the requirements of
 the expanded track and trace program described in subdivision (a) to report the movement of cannabis and cannabis products throughout the distribution chain and communicate the information to licensing agencies as required by law.

(c) Any software, database, or other information technology system utilized by the department to implement the expanded track and trace program shall support interoperability with third-party cannabis business software applications and allow all licensee-facing system activities to be performed through a secure
 application programming interface (API) or comparable technology that is well documented, bi-directional, and accessible to any third-party application that has been validated and has appropriate credentials. The API or comparable technology shall have version control and provide adequate notice of updates to third-party applications. The system should provide a test environment for third-party applications to access that mirrors the production environment.

(d) (1) The department shall incorporate delivery into the track and trace program no later than January 1, 2023.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, provisions related to inclusion of information related to delivery in the track and trace system in Sections 26067 and 26090 shall only become
 effective after the department incorporates delivery into the track and trace program as required by this subdivision.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may adopt and readopt emergency regulations to implement this subdivision. The provisions of Section 26013 shall be applicable to emergency regulations adopted or readopted pursuant to this section. The emergency regulations authorized by this paragraph shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of public peace, health, safety, or general welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 14.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26069.

(a) (1) The department shall implement a unique identification program for cannabis and cannabis products.

(2) The unique identification program shall include the identification of permitted quantities of cannabis plants at a cultivation site during the cultivation
 period, and the identification of harvest batches and manufactured batches, as required by the department. The unique identifier shall be recorded in a manner as determined by the department by regulation.

(b) Unique identifiers shall only be issued to those persons appropriately licensed by this division.

(c) Information associated with the assigned unique identifier and licensee shall be included in the trace and track program specified in Section 26067.

(d) The department may charge a fee to cover the reasonable costs of issuing the unique identifier and
 monitoring and tracking the movement of cannabis and cannabis products throughout the distribution chain.

(e) The department shall take adequate steps to establish protections against fraudulent unique identifiers and limit illegal diversion of unique identifiers to unlicensed persons.

(f) A city, county, or city and county may administer unique identifiers and associated identifying information but a city, county, or city and county’s identifiers shall not supplant the department’s track and trace program.

(g) This section does not apply to the cultivation of cannabis in accordance with Section 11362.1 of the Health and Safety Code or the Compassionate Use Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 15.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Retailers, Distributors, Microbusinesses, and Combined Activities [26070. - 26071.]

26070.

Retailers, Distributors, Microbusinesses, and Combined Activities.

(a) State licenses to be issued by the department related to the sale and distribution of cannabis and cannabis products are as follows:

(1) A retailer shall have a licensed premises which is a physical location from which commercial cannabis activities are conducted. A retailer’s premises may be closed to the public. A retailer may conduct sales exclusively by delivery.

(2) A distributor licensee shall be bonded and insured at a minimum level established by the department.

(3) (A) Microbusiness or combined activities licenses that authorize cultivation of cannabis shall include the license conditions described in subdivision (b) of Section 26060.1.

(B) The department shall establish a process by which an applicant for a microbusiness or combined activities license can demonstrate compliance with all the requirements under this division for the activities that will be conducted under the license.

(b) The department shall establish minimum security and transportation safety requirements for the commercial distribution and delivery of cannabis, industrial hemp, and cannabis products. Except as provided in subdivision (e) of Section 26110, the transportation of cannabis, industrial hemp, and cannabis products shall only be
 conducted by licensed persons authorized to engage in distribution under this division or employees of those persons. Transportation safety standards established by the department shall include, but not be limited to, minimum standards governing the types of vehicles in which cannabis, industrial hemp, and cannabis products may be distributed and delivered and minimum qualifications for persons eligible to operate such vehicles.

(c) The driver of a vehicle transporting or transferring cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products shall be directly employed by a licensee authorized to transport or transfer cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, all vehicles transporting cannabis, industrial hemp, and cannabis products for hire shall be required
 to have a valid motor carrier permit pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 34620) of Division 14.85 of the Vehicle Code. The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall have authority over the safe operation of these vehicles, including, but not limited to, requiring licensees engaged in the transportation of cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products to participate in the Basic Inspection of Terminals (BIT) program pursuant to Section 34501.12 of the Vehicle Code.

(e) Prior to transporting cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products, a licensed distributor shall do both of the following:

(1) Complete an electronic shipping manifest as prescribed by the department. The shipping manifest shall include the unique identifier, pursuant to Section 26067, issued by the
 department for the cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis product.

(2) Securely transmit the manifest to the department and the licensee that will receive the cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis product.

(f) During transportation, the licensed distributor shall maintain a physical copy of the shipping manifest and make it available upon request to agents of the department and law enforcement officers.

(g) The licensee receiving the shipment shall maintain each electronic shipping manifest and shall make it available upon request to the department and any law enforcement officers.

(h) Upon receipt of the transported shipment, the licensee receiving
 the shipment shall submit to the department a record verifying receipt of the shipment and the details of the shipment.

(i) Transporting, or arranging for or facilitating the transport of, cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products in violation of this chapter is grounds for disciplinary action against the license.

(j) Licensed retailers, microbusinesses, and combined activities, and licensed nonprofits under Section 26070.5, shall implement security measures reasonably designed to prevent unauthorized entrance into areas containing cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products and theft of cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products from the premises. These security measures shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Prohibiting individuals from remaining on the licensee’s premises if they are not engaging in activity expressly related to the operations of the retailer.

(2) Establishing limited access areas accessible only to authorized personnel.

(3) Other than limited amounts of cannabis or cannabis products used for display purposes, samples, or immediate sale, storing all finished cannabis and cannabis products in a secured and locked room, safe, or vault, and in a manner reasonably designed to prevent diversion, theft, and loss.

(k) A retailer shall notify the department and the appropriate law enforcement authorities within 24 hours after discovering any of the following:

(1) Significant discrepancies identified during inventory. The level of significance shall be determined by the department.

(2) Diversion, theft, loss, or any criminal activity pertaining to the operation of the retailer.

(3) Diversion, theft, loss, or any criminal activity by any agent or employee of the retailer pertaining to the operation of the retailer.

(4) The loss or unauthorized alteration of records related to cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products, registered qualifying patients, primary caregivers, or retailer employees or agents.

(5) Any other breach of
 security.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 16.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26070.1.

Cannabis or cannabis products purchased by a customer shall not leave a licensed retail premises unless they are placed in an opaque package.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 60.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26070.2.

A person shall not sell, offer, or provide a product in the state that is any of the following:

(a) An alcoholic beverage that contains cannabinoids, including, but not limited to, an infusion of cannabis or cannabinoids derived from industrial hemp into an alcoholic beverage.

(b) An inhalable cannabis product containing tetrahydrocannabinols derived from industrial hemp.

(c) Hemp flower or a pre-roll that contains hemp flower or hemp-derived cannabinoids, whether infused or not.

(d) A product containing synthetic
 cannabinoids.

(e) A cannabis product manufactured outside the licensed market.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 17.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26070.3.

(a) (1) On or before January 1, 2025, the department, in consultation with the State Department of Public Health, shall create and post for public use a single-page flat or folded brochure that includes steps for safer use of cannabis, including, but not limited to, both of the following:

(A) Information about the pharmacological effects of cannabis use.

(B) Information on the implications and risks associated with, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) High potency cannabis products. 

(ii) The potential for THC to exacerbate certain mental health conditions.

(iii) Cannabis use by minors.

(iv) Cannabis use by pregnant and breastfeeding persons.

(2) The brochure shall be printed in a type size not smaller than 12 points. Printing and distribution shall be the responsibility of the licensee.

(3) On or before January 1, 2030, and every five years thereafter, the department shall either recertify the information in the brochure or provide updated language that accurately reflects the state of the evolving science on cannabis health effects and safer use of cannabis. The review of the
 brochure shall be done in conjunction with the review required in Section 26121.

(b) On and after March 1, 2025, a retailer or microbusiness selling, or person delivering, cannabis or cannabis products to a consumer shall prominently display the brochure, including printed copies, at the point of sale or final delivery in person and online at time of online purchases, and offer each new consumer a copy of the brochure created pursuant to subdivision (a) at the time of first purchase or delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 491, Sec. 1.   (SB 540)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

26070.5.

(a) The Bureau of Cannabis Control shall, by January 1, 2020, investigate the feasibility of creating one or more classifications of nonprofit licenses under this section. The feasibility determination shall be made in consultation with the relevant licensing agencies and representatives of local jurisdictions which issue temporary licenses pursuant to subdivision (b). The Bureau of Cannabis Control shall consider factors, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Should nonprofit licensees be exempted from any or all state taxes, licensing fees, and regulatory provisions applicable to other licenses in this division?

(2) Should funding incentives be created to encourage others licensed under this division to provide professional services at reduced or no cost to nonprofit licensees?

(3) Should nonprofit licenses be limited to, or prioritize those, entities previously operating on a not-for-profit basis primarily providing whole-plant cannabis and cannabis products and a diversity of cannabis strains and seed stock to low-income persons?

(b) Any local jurisdiction may issue temporary local licenses to nonprofit entities primarily providing whole-plant cannabis and cannabis products and a diversity of cannabis strains and seed stock to low-income persons so long as the local jurisdiction does all of the following:

(1) Confirms
 the license applicant’s status as a nonprofit entity registered with the California Attorney General’s Registry of Charities and Fundraisers and that the applicant is in good standing with all state requirements governing nonprofit entities.

(2) Licenses and regulates any such entity to protect public health and safety, and so as to require compliance with all environmental requirements in this division.

(3) Provides notice to the department of any such local licenses issued, including the name and location of any such licensed entity and all local regulations governing the licensed entity’s operation.

(4) Certifies to the department that any such licensed entity will not generate annual gross revenues in excess of two million
 dollars ($2,000,000).

(c) Temporary local licenses authorized under subdivision (b) shall expire after 12 months unless renewed by the local jurisdiction.

(d) The department may impose reasonable additional requirements on the local licenses authorized under subdivision (b).

(e) (1) New temporary local licenses shall not be issued pursuant to this section after the date the Bureau of Cannabis Control determines that creation of nonprofit licenses under this division is not feasible, or if the Bureau of Cannabis Control determines that creation of nonprofit licenses under this division is feasible, after the date a licensing agency commences issuing state nonprofit licenses.

(2) If the Bureau of Cannabis Control determines that creation of nonprofit licenses under this division is feasible, no temporary license issued under subdivision (b) shall be renewed or extended after the date on which a licensing agency commences issuing state nonprofit licenses.

(3) If the Bureau of Cannabis Control determines that creation of nonprofit licenses under this division is not feasible, the Bureau of Cannabis Control shall provide notice of this determination to all local jurisdictions that have issued temporary licenses under subdivision (b). The department may, in its discretion, permit any such local jurisdiction to renew or extend on an annual basis any temporary license previously issued under subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 478, Sec. 4.   (AB 1756)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26071.

(a) To provide access to medicinal cannabis patients who have difficulty accessing cannabis or cannabis products, a licensee that is authorized to make retail sales may provide free cannabis or cannabis products if all of the following criteria are met:

(1) Free cannabis or cannabis products are provided only to a medicinal cannabis patient or the patient’s primary caregiver. For purposes of this section, “medicinal cannabis patient” includes a qualified patient, as defined under Section 11362.7 of the Health and Safety Code, or a person in possession of a valid identification card issued under Section 11362.71 of the Health and Safety Code.
